Utah statutes.
10-8-19.   Water supply -- Special tax for increasing supply when city acting as distributing agent.

Whenever a city is acting as distributing agent of water, not the property of the corporation, outside of or within the corporate limits of such city, upon written petition of the owners of such water, it may increase the supply of water owned by such persons by any means provided in Section 10-8-18, and for that purpose may levy and collect from the owners of such water a tax not exceeding such sum per acre of land owned by such persons as may have been agreed upon and designated in said petition; said tax when so collected to be appropriated exclusively to said purposes, except such part thereof as is necessary to pay the expense of levying and collecting the same. Said tax shall constitute a lien upon the water rights of the persons and the land irrigated thereby, and shall be levied and collected as provided in Section 10-8-17.

